Utah statutes.
77-15a-102.   "Mentally retarded" defined.
As used in this chapter, a defendant is "mentally retarded" if:
(1)  the defendant has significant subaverage general intellectual functioning
that results in and exists concurrently with significant deficiencies in
adaptive functioning that exist primarily in the areas of reasoning or impulse
control, or in both of these areas; and
(2)  the subaverage general intellectual functioning and the significant
deficiencies in adaptive functioning under Subsection (1) are both manifested
prior to age 22.
